Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 3. Organization and Operating Agreement.

Sec. 10.50.070.
Organizers.

One or more persons may organize a limited liability company by signing articles of organization and delivering the signed articles to the department for filing. A person who organizes a limited liability company may be a person who is not a member of the company when the company is organized or after the company is organized.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997],” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 10.

Sec. 10.50.075.
Contents of articles of organization.

The articles of organization of a limited liability company must state

the name of the company;

the purpose for which the company is organized, which may be stated to be, or to include, the conduct of any or all lawful affairs for which a limited liability company may be organized under this chapter;

the mailing address of the company’s registered office and the name of the company’s registered agent;

if applicable, that the company will be managed by a manager; and

any other provision for the regulation of the internal affairs of the company that is consistent with this chapter and the laws of this state if the persons organizing the company elect to include the provision in the articles of organization.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 23 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (4) and (5) were enacted as (5) and (6), and renumbered in 2012.

Sec. 10.50.078.
Disclosure of company activities.

The organizers delivering articles of organization under AS

10.50.070

shall deliver with the articles a separate statement of the codes from the identification codes established under AS

10.06.870

that most closely describe the activities in which the company will initially engage.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.080.
Effective date of organization.

A limited liability company is organized when the articles of organization for the company that conform to the filing requirements of this chapter are delivered to the department for filing under AS

10.50.820

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.085.
Election of duration. [Repealed, § 23 ch 78 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 10.50.090.
Conclusive evidence of compliance.

A copy of the articles of organization that is stamped “filed” and marked with the filing date is conclusive evidence that the organizers of the limited liability company have complied with all conditions precedent required to be performed by the organizers and that the company has been organized under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.095.
Operating agreement.

The members of a limited liability company may adopt an operating agreement for the company and may amend and repeal the agreement. The articles of organization may restrict or eliminate the power of the members to adopt, amend, or repeal an operating agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)